fr: Choucroute d'Alsace
nl: Zuurkolen uit de Elzas

en: Sauerkrauts without garnish, Sauerkraut without garnish
fr: Choucroutes sans garniture
hr: Kiseli kupus bez ukrasa
lt: Rauginti kopūstai be garnyro
nl: Zuurkolen zonder garnering

en: Cooked sauerkrauts without garnish, Cooked sauerkraut without garnish
fr: Choucroutes cuites sans garnitures, Choucroute sans garniture égouttée cuite
hr: Kuhani kiseli kupus bez ukrasa
lt: Kepti rauginti kopūstai be garnyro
nl: Zuurkolen zonder garnering (uitgelekt, gekookt)

en: Raw sauerkrauts without garnish
fr: Choucroutes crues sans garnitures

en: Sauerkraut with garnish
fr: Choucroutes garnies, Choucroute garnie
hr: Kiseli kupus s ukrasom
lt: Rauginti kopūstai su garnyru
nl: Zuurkolen met garnering

en: Fermented vegetables
fr: Légumes fermentés
hr: Fermentirano povrće
nl: Gefermenteerde groenten
pl: Kiszone warzywa

en: Cold starters
de: Kalte Vorspeisen
es: Entrantes fríos
fi: Kylmät alkuruoat
fr: Entrées froides
hr: Hladna predjela
it: Antipasti freddi
lt: Šalti užkandžiai
nl: Koude voorgerechten

en: Coleslaw, Coleslaw with sauce
de: Krautsalat
es: Ensalada de col
fi: coleslaw
fr: Coleslaw, Salade coleslaw, Salade de chou avec sauce, Coleslaw avec sauce
hr: Salata od kupusa
it: Insalata di cavolo
ja: コールスロー
lt: Kopūstų salotos, Kopūstų salotos su padažu
nl: Koolsalade

en: St. Jacques shells, Scallops
fr: Coquilles Saint-Jacques, Coquilles St-Jacques
hr: Sv. jacques školjke
nl: St. Jakobs schelpen

en: Flammekueche, Flamed tart, Thin-crusted onion tart with cream and lardoons
de: Flammkuchen
fr: Flammekueches, Flammekueche, tarte flambée, tartes flambées, flamme-küche, flamms, Flammkuchen, Flamenkuches, Tartes flambées aux lardons
hr: Flammekueche
it: Flammkuchen
nl: Flammekueche

en: Frozen flammekueche
fr: Flammekueches surgelées

en: Vegetable patties
de: Gemüsefrikadellen
fr: Galettes de légumes
hr: Pljeskavice od povrća
ja: 野菜のパテ
lt: Daržovių paplotėliai
nl: Groentenschijven
pl: Warzywne kotlety

en: Frozen vegetable patties
fr: Galettes de légumes surgelées

en: Frozen vegetable rosti, Frozen pre-fried vegetable rosti
fr: Palets de légumes préfrits surgelés, Galettes de légumes préfrites surgelées

en: Frozen potato rostis, Frozen Rostis, Frozen Potatoes cakes, Frozen Potato cakes
da: Frosne røsti
fr: Röstis de pommes de terre surgelés, Rostis surgelés, Galette de pomme de terre surgelée, Galette de pommes de terre surgelées

en: Frozen pre-fried cooked vegetable rosti
fr: Palets de légumes préfrits cuits surgelés, Galettes de légumes préfrites cuites surgelées

en: Frozen potato buns
da: Frosne kartoffelboller
sv: Frysta potatisbullar

en: Frozen potato croquettes
sv: Frysta potatiskroketter

en: Breaded vegetables
fr: Légumes panés

en: Frozen breaded vegetables
fr: Légumes panés surgelés